California statutes. Vehicle Code
======================================================================
  Vehicle Code
  State of California
======================================================================

Source: Official California Legislative Information
        https://downloads.leginfo.legislature.ca.gov/
Last Updated by State of California: September 26, 2026


======================================================================



======================================================================

GENERAL PROVISIONS

1.

This act shall be known as the Vehicle Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2.

The provisions of this code, insofar as they are substantially the same as existing provisions relating to the same subject matter, shall be construed as restatements and continuations thereof and not as new enactments.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

3.

All persons who, at the time this code goes into effect, hold office under the code repealed by this code, which offices are continued by this code, continue to hold them according to their former tenure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4.

No action or proceeding commenced before this code takes effect, and no right accrued, is affected by the provisions of this code, but all procedure thereafter taken therein shall conform to the provisions of this code so far as possible.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

5.

If any portion of this code is held unconstitutional, such decision shall not affect the validity of any other portion of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

6.

Unless the provision or the context otherwise requires, these general provisions and rules of construction shall govern the construction of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

7.

Division, chapter, and article headings do not in any manner affect the scope, meaning, or intent of the provisions of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

8.

Whenever, by the provisions of this code, a power is granted to a public officer or a duty imposed upon such an officer, the power may be exercised or the duty performed by a deputy of the officer or by a person authorized pursuant to law by the officer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

9.

Whenever any notice, report, statement, or record is required by this code, it shall be made in writing in the English language.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10.

Whenever any reference is made to any portion of this code or of any other law, such reference shall apply to all amendments and additions heretofore or hereafter made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

11.

“Section” means a section of this code unless some other statute is specifically mentioned and “subdivision” means a subdivision of the section in which that term occurs unless some other section is expressly mentioned.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

12.

The present tense includes the past and future tenses; and the future, the present.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

12.2.

“Spouse” includes “registered domestic partner,” as required by Section 297.5 of the Family Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 117.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13.

The masculine gender includes the feminine and neuter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

14.

The singular number includes the plural, and the plural the singular.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

15.

“Shall” is mandatory and “may” is permissive.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

16.

“Oath” includes affirmation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

17.

“Signature” or “subscription” includes mark when the signer or subscriber cannot write, such signer’s or subscriber’s name being written near the mark by a witness who writes his own name near the signer’s or subscriber’s name; but a signature or subscription by mark can be acknowledged or can serve as a signature or subscription to a sworn statement only when two witnesses so sign their own names thereto.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

18.

Officers and employees of the Department of Motor Vehicles and the Department of the California Highway Patrol are, for the purposes of this code, authorized to administer oaths and acknowledge signatures, for which no fee shall be charged.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19.

Whenever the acknowledgement of any document is required by this code or any regulation of either department, the signature of the applicant attested to in his presence by the signature of a subscribing witness is sufficient.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

20.

It is unlawful to use a false or fictitious name, or to knowingly make any false statement or knowingly conceal any material fact in any document filed with the Department of Motor Vehicles or the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

21.

(a) Except as otherwise expressly provided, the provisions of this code are applicable and uniform throughout the state and in all counties and municipalities therein, and a local authority shall not enact or enforce any ordinance or resolution on the matters covered by this code, including ordinances or resolutions that establish regulations or procedures for, or assess a fine, penalty, assessment, or fee for a violation of, matters covered by this code, unless expressly authorized by this code.

(b) To the extent permitted by current state law, this section does not impair the current lawful authority of the Mountains Recreation and Conservation Authority, a joint powers authority, or any member agency constituted therein as of July 1, 2010, to enforce an ordinance or resolution relating to the management of public lands within its jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 616, Sec. 1.   (SB 949)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2011, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 616.)
-------------------------------------------

22.

Whenever notice is required to be given under this code by a department or any division, officer, employee, or agent, the notice shall be given either by personal delivery to the person to be notified, by certified mail, return receipt requested, by mailing the notice, postage prepaid, addressed to the person at their address as shown by the records of the department, or by electronic notification, as authorized pursuant to Section 1801.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 214.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

23.

The giving of notice by personal delivery is complete upon delivery of a copy of the notice to the person to be notified. The giving of notice by mail is complete upon the expiration of four days after deposit of the notice in the mail, except that in the case of a notice informing a person of an offense against them under Section 40001, the notice is complete 10 days after mailing. The giving of notice by electronic notification, as authorized pursuant to Section 1801.2, is complete upon sending the electronic notification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 838, Sec. 2.   (SB 1193)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

24.

Proof of the giving of notice may be made by the certificate of any officer, employee, or agent of the Department of Motor Vehicles and the Department of the California Highway Patrol or of any peace officer, or by an affidavit of any person over 18 years of age, naming the person to whom the notice was given and specifying the time, place, and manner of the giving of the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1154, Sec. 55.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

24.5.

All civil process in actions brought against the director and the Department of Motor Vehicles and all subpoenas for the production of department records shall be served upon the director or his appointed representatives at the department’s headquarters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 699.)
-------------------------------------------

25.

(a) It is unlawful for a person to display or cause or permit to be displayed any sign, mark, or advertisement indicating an official connection with either the Department of Motor Vehicles or the Department of the California Highway Patrol unless the person has lawful authority, permission, or right to make
 that display.

(b) It is unlawful for the holder of an occupational license issued pursuant to Division 5 (commencing with Section 11100) to use the initials “DMV,” the Department of Motor Vehicles logogram, or the words “Department of Motor Vehicles” in any business
 name, telephone number, or internet domain name, as defined in Section 17527 of the Business and Professions Code. An occupational licensee shall not use the initials, logogram, or words in any advertisement in a way that indicates, or could be construed to indicate, an official connection with the Department of Motor Vehicles other than as a
 licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 68, Sec. 1.   (AB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

25.5.

It is unlawful for any person to falsely represent himself or herself in any manner as an employee of the Department of Motor Vehicles for the purpose of obtaining records or information to which he or she is not entitled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 105.)
-------------------------------------------

27.

Any person who without authority impersonates, or wears the badge of, a member of the California Highway Patrol with intention to deceive anyone is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

28.

(a) Whenever possession is taken of any vehicle by or on behalf of its legal owner under the terms of a security agreement or lease agreement, the person taking possession shall contact, for the purpose of providing the information required pursuant to subdivision (d), within one hour after taking possession of the vehicle, by the most expeditious means available, the city police department where the taking of possession occurred, if within an incorporated city, or the sheriff’s department of the county where the taking of possession occurred, if outside an incorporated city, or the police department of a campus of the University of California or the California State University, if the taking of possession occurred on that
 campus.
 If, after an attempt to notify, law enforcement is unable to receive and record the notification required pursuant to subdivision (d), the person taking possession of the vehicle shall continue to attempt notification until the information required pursuant to subdivision (d) is provided.

(b) If possession is taken of more than one vehicle, the possession of each vehicle shall be considered and reported as a separate event.

(c) Any person failing to notify the city police department, sheriff’s department, or campus police department as required by this section is guilty of an infraction, and shall be fined a minimum of three hundred dollars ($300), and up to five hundred dollars ($500). The district attorney, city attorney, or city prosecutor shall promptly
 notify the Bureau of Security and Investigative Services of any conviction resulting from a violation of this section.

(d) For the notification required by this section, the person shall report only the following information and in the following order:

(1) The approximate location of the repossession.

(2) The date and approximate time of the repossession.

(3) The vehicle year, make, and model.

(4) The last six digits of the vehicle identification number.

(5) The registered owner as provided on the repossession assignment.

(6) The legal owner requesting the repossession as provided on the repossession assignment.

(7) The name of the repossession agency.

(8) The telephone number of the repossession agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 740, Sec. 13.   (AB 281)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

29.

Wherever a notice or other communication is required by this code to be mailed by registered mail by or to a person or corporation, the mailing of that notice or other communication by certified mail, or by electronic notification, as authorized pursuant to Section 1801.2, shall be deemed to be a sufficient compliance with the requirements of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 838, Sec. 3.   (SB 1193)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

30.

It is declared as a matter of legislative policy that red lights and sirens on vehicles should be restricted to authorized emergency vehicles engaged in police, fire and lifesaving services; and that other types of vehicles which are engaged in activities which create special hazards upon the highways should be equipped with flashing amber warning lamps.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 653.)
-------------------------------------------

31.

No person shall give, either orally or in writing, information to a peace officer while in the performance of his duties under the provisions of this code when such person knows that the information is false.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1264.)
-------------------------------------------

32.

Whenever local authorities are given the power to take action by ordinance pursuant to Division 11 (commencing with Section 21000) and Division 15 (commencing with Section 35000), they shall also have the power to take such action by resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1095.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 1. WORDS AND PHRASES DEFINED [100. - 681.]

100.

Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, these definitions shall govern the construction of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

102.

“Ability to respond in damages” means financial responsibility.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 95 by Stats. 1992, Ch. 974, Sec. 2.   Effective September 28, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

105.

An “agricultural water-well boring rig” is a motor vehicle which is used exclusively in the boring of water-wells on agricultural property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

108.

“Airbrakes” means a brake system using compressed air either for actuating the service brakes at the wheels of the vehicle or as a source of power for controlling or applying service brakes which are actuated through hydraulic or other intermediate means.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

109.

“Alcoholic beverage” includes any liquid or solid material intended to be ingested by a person which contains ethanol, also known as ethyl alcohol, drinking alcohol, or alcohol, including, but not limited to, alcoholic beverages as defined in Section 23004 of the Business and Professions Code, intoxicating liquor, malt beverage, beer, wine, spirits, liqueur, whiskey, rum, vodka, cordials, gin, and brandy, and any mixture containing one or more alcoholic beverages. Alcoholic beverage includes a mixture of one or more alcoholic beverages whether found or ingested separately or as a mixture.

For purposes of the Driver License Compact, “intoxicating liquor” as used in Section 15023 has the same meaning as “alcoholic beverage” as used in this code.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 23151 by Stats. 1982, Ch. 53, Sec. 25.   Effective February 18, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

110.

“Alley” is any highway having a roadway not exceeding 25 feet in width which is primarily used for access to the rear or side entrances of abutting property; provided, that the City and County of San Francisco may designate by ordinance or resolution as an “alley” any highway having a roadway not exceeding 25 feet in width.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 833.)
-------------------------------------------

111.

(a) “All-terrain vehicle” means a motor vehicle subject to subdivision (a) of Section 38010 that is all of the following:

(1) Designed for operation off
 of the highway by an operator with no more than one passenger.

(2) Fifty inches or less in width.

(3) Nine hundred pounds or less unladen weight.

(4) Suspended on three or more low-pressure tires.

(5) Has a single seat designed to be straddled by the operator, or a single seat designed to be straddled by the operator and a seat for no more than one passenger.

(6) Has handlebars for steering control.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), for purposes of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 3000) of Division 2 and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11700) of Division 5, “all-terrain vehicle” also means a recreational off-highway vehicle as defined in Section 500 and a utility-terrain vehicle as defined in Section 531.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 279, Sec. 1.   (AB 988)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

111.3.

An “all-terrain vehicle safety instructor” is a person who is sponsored by an all-terrain vehicle safety training organization, who has completed a course in all-terrain vehicle safety instruction administered by an approved all-terrain vehicle safety training organization, and who has been licensed by the department pursuant to Section 11105.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 881, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

111.5.

An “all-terrain vehicle safety training organization” is any organization which is approved to offer a program of instruction in all-terrain vehicle safety, including all-terrain vehicle safety instruction training, by the Off-Highway Vehicle Safety Education Committee and which has been issued a license by the department pursuant to Section 11105.6.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 881, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

112.

“Amber” has the same meaning as “yellow,” and is within the chromaticity coordinate boundaries for yellow specified in regulations adopted by the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 287.)
-------------------------------------------

115.

An “armored car” is a vehicle that is equipped with materials on either the front, sides, or rear for the protection of persons therein from missiles discharged from firearms.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

165.

An authorized emergency vehicle is:

(a) Any publicly owned and operated ambulance, lifeguard, or lifesaving equipment or any privately owned or operated ambulance licensed by the Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol to operate in response to emergency calls.

(b) Any publicly owned vehicle operated by the following persons, agencies, or organizations:

(1) Any federal, state, or local agency, department, or district employing peace officers as that term is defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Part 2 of Title 3 of the Penal Code, for use by those officers in the performance of their duties.

(2) Any forestry or fire department of any public agency or fire department organized as provided in the Health and Safety Code.

(c) Any vehicle owned by the state, or any bridge and highway district, and equipped and used either for fighting fires, or towing or servicing other vehicles, caring for injured persons, or repairing damaged lighting or electrical equipment.

(d) Any state-owned vehicle used in responding to emergency fire, rescue, or communications calls and operated either by the Office of Emergency Services or by any public agency or industrial fire department to which the Office of Emergency Services has assigned the vehicle.

(e) (1) Any vehicle owned or operated by a federally recognized Indian tribe used in responding to
 emergency, fire, ambulance, or lifesaving calls. For the purposes of this section and the provisions of Sections 2501 and 2510, a vehicle used in responding to emergency, fire, ambulance, or lifesaving calls owned or operated by a federally recognized Indian tribe is considered an authorized emergency vehicle.

(2) Any vehicle owned or operated by any department or agency of the United States government when the vehicle is used in responding to emergency fire, ambulance, or lifesaving calls or is actively engaged in law enforcement work.

(f) Any vehicle for which an authorized emergency vehicle permit has been issued by the Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 282, Sec. 1.   (AB 798)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

165.5.

No act or omission of any rescue team operating in conjunction with an authorized emergency vehicle as defined in Section 165, while attempting to resuscitate any person who is in immediate danger of loss of life, shall impose any liability upon the rescue team or the owners or operators of any authorized emergency vehicle, if good faith is exercised.

For the purposes of this section, “rescue team” means a special group of physicians and surgeons, nurses, volunteers, or employees of the owners or operators of the authorized emergency vehicle who have been trained in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and have been designated by the owners or operators of the emergency vehicle to attempt to resuscitate persons who are in immediate danger of loss of life in cases of emergency.

This section shall not relieve the owners or operators of any other duty imposed upon them by law for the designation and training of members of a rescue team or for any provisions regarding maintenance of equipment to be used by the rescue team.

Members of a rescue team shall receive the training in a program approved by, or conforming to, standards prescribed by an emergency medical care committee established pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 1797.270) of Chapter 4 of Division 2.5 of the Health and Safety Code, or a voluntary area health planning agency established pursuant to Section 127155 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 421.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

166.

An “autobroker” or “auto buying service” is a dealer, as defined in Section 285, who engages in the business of brokering, as defined in Section 232.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1253, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

175.

An “autoette” is a motor vehicle, located on a natural island with an area in excess of 20,000 acres and that is within a county having a population in excess of 4,000,000, that meets all of the following requirements:

(a) Has three or more wheels in contact with the ground.

(b) Has an unladed weight of no greater than 1,800 pounds.

(c) Has an overall length of no more than 130 inches, including the front and rear bumpers.

(d) Has a width of no more than 55 inches, as measured from its widest part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 91, Sec. 1.   (AB 705)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

210.

An “automated enforcement system” is any system operated by a governmental agency, in cooperation with a law enforcement agency, that photographically records a driver’s responses to a rail or rail transit signal or crossing gate, or both, or to an official traffic control signal described in Section 21450, and is designed to obtain a clear photograph of a vehicle’s license plate and the driver of the vehicle.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 922, Sec. 1) by Stats. 1998, Ch. 54, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

220.

(a) An “automobile dismantler” is a person not otherwise expressly excluded by Section 221 who is engaged in the business of buying, selling, or dealing in vehicles of a type required to be registered under this code, including nonrepairable vehicles, for the purpose of dismantling the vehicles, who buys or sells the integral parts and component materials thereof, in whole or in part, or deals in used motor vehicle parts. This section does not apply to the occasional and incidental dismantling of vehicles by dealers who have secured dealer plates from the department for the current year whose principal business is buying and selling new and used vehicles, or by owners who desire to dismantle not more than three personal vehicles within any 12-month period.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), “automobile dismantler” includes a person not otherwise expressly excluded by Section 221 who keeps or maintains on real property owned by the person, or under their possession or control, either of the following vehicles or catalytic converters, whether for the purpose of resale of used parts, for the purpose of reclaiming for use some or all of the materials, whether metal, glass, fabric, or otherwise, or to dispose of them, or for any other purpose:

(1) Two or more unregistered motor vehicles no longer intended for, or in condition for, legal use on the highways.

(2) Nine or more used catalytic converters that have been cut from a motor vehicle using a sharp implement.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding
 paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), a “junk dealer,” as defined in Section 21601 of the Business and Professions Code, a “recycler,” as defined in Section 21605 of the Business and Professions Code, or a “commercial enterprise” or “core recycler,” as defined in Section 21610 of the Business and Professions Code, is not an automobile dismantler even if it possesses nine or more used catalytic converters that have been cut from a motor vehicle using a sharp implement.

(2) This subdivision does not apply to a “commercial enterprise” described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 21610 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 537, Sec. 1.   (AB 641)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

221.

(a) The term “automobile dismantler” does not include any of the following:

(1) The owner or operator of any premises on which two or more unregistered and inoperable vehicles are held or stored, or a person who possesses nine or more catalytic converters, if the vehicles or catalytic converters are used for restoration or replacement parts or otherwise, in conjunction with any of the following:

(A) Any business of a licensed dealer, manufacturer, or transporter.

(B) The operation and maintenance of any fleet of motor vehicles used for the transportation of persons or property.

(C) Any agricultural, farming, mining, or ranching business that does not sell parts of the vehicles, except for either of the following purposes:

(i) For use in repairs performed by that business.

(ii) For use by a licensed dismantler or an entity described in paragraph (3).

(D) Any motor vehicle repair business registered with the Bureau of Automotive Repair, or those exempt from registration under the Business and Professions Code or applicable regulations, that does not sell parts of the vehicles, except for either of the following purposes:

(i) For use in repairs performed by that business.

(ii) For use by a licensed
 dismantler or an entity described in paragraph (3).

(2) A person engaged in the restoration of vehicles of the type described in Section 5004 or in the restoration of other vehicles having historic or classic significance.

(3) The owner of a steel mill, scrap metal processing facility, or similar establishment purchasing vehicles of a type subject to registration, not for the purpose of selling the vehicles, in whole or in part, but exclusively for the purpose of reducing the vehicles to their component materials, if either the facility obtains, on a form approved or provided by the department, a certification by the person from whom the vehicles are obtained that each of the vehicles has been cleared for dismantling pursuant to Section 5500 or 11520, or the facility complies with Section 9564.

(4) Any person who
 acquires used parts or components for resale from vehicles which have been previously cleared for dismantling pursuant to Section 5500 or 11520.

Nothing in this paragraph permits a dismantler to acquire or sell used parts or components during the time the dismantler license is under suspension.

(b) Any vehicle acquired for the purpose specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) from other than a licensed dismantler, or from other than an independent hauler who obtained the vehicle, or parts thereof from a licensed dismantler, shall be accompanied by either a receipt issued by the department evidencing proof of clearance for dismantling under Section 5500, or a copy of the ordinance or order issued by a local authority for the abatement of the vehicle pursuant to Section 22660. The steel mill, scrap metal processing facility, or similar establishment acquiring the vehicle shall attach the form
 evidencing clearance or abatement to the certification required pursuant to this section.

All forms specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) and in this subdivision shall be available for inspection by a peace officer during business hours.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 537, Sec. 2.   (AB 641)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

223.

Any reference in this code to “automobile driver training” shall be deemed to refer to the laboratory phase of driver education described by Section 51852 of the Education Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676, Sec. 305.)
-------------------------------------------

225.

An “auxiliary dolly” is a vehicle, not designed for carrying persons or property on its own structure, which is so constructed and used in conjunction with a semitrailer as to support a portion of the weight of the semitrailer and any load thereon, but not permanently attached to the semitrailer, although a part of the weight of such dolly may rest on another vehicle.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

230.

An “axle” is a structure or portion of a structure consisting of one or more shafts, spindles, or bearings in the same vertical transverse plane by means of which, in conjunction with wheels mounted on said shafts, spindles, or bearings, a portion of the weight of a vehicle and its load, if any, is continuously transmitted to the roadway when the vehicle is in motion.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

230.5.

A “B-train assembly” is a rigid frame extension attached to the rear frame of a semitrailer which allows for a fifth wheel connection point for a second semitrailer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 13, Sec. 13.   Effective February 13, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

231.

A bicycle is a device upon which a person may ride, propelled exclusively by human power, except as provided in Section 312.5, through a belt, chain, or gears, and having one or more wheels. A person riding a bicycle is subject to the provisions of this code specified in Sections 21200 and 21200.5. An electric bicycle is a bicycle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 311, Sec. 1.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

231.5.

A “bicycle path” or “bike path” is a Class I bikeway, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 890.4 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 200, Sec. 5.   (SB 734)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

231.6.

(a) A “bicycle path crossing” is either of the following:

(1) That portion of a roadway included within the prolongation or connection of the boundary lines of a bike path at intersections where the intersecting roadways meet at approximately right angles.

(2) Any portion of a roadway distinctly indicated for bicycle crossing by lines or other markings on the surface.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), there shall not be a bicycle path crossing where local authorities have placed signs indicating no crossing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 200, Sec. 6.   (SB 734)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

232.

The “board” is the New Motor Vehicle Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 996.)
-------------------------------------------

232.5.

“Brokering” is an arrangement under which a dealer, for a fee or other consideration, regardless of the form or time of payment, provides or offers to provide the service of arranging, negotiating, assisting, or effectuating the purchase of a new or used motor vehicle, not owned by the dealer, for another or others.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1253, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

233.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a “bus” is any vehicle, including a trailer bus, designed, used, or maintained for carrying more than 15 persons including the driver.

(b) A vehicle designed, used, or maintained for carrying more than 10 persons, including the driver, which is used to transport persons for compensation or profit, or is used by any nonprofit organization or group, is also a bus.

(c) This section does not alter the definition of a schoolbus, school pupil activity bus, general public paratransit vehicle, farm labor vehicle, or youth bus.

(d) A vanpool vehicle is not a bus.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

234.

A “business” includes a proprietorship, partnership, corporation, and any other form of commercial enterprise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1563, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

235.

A “business district” is that portion of a highway and the property contiguous thereto (a) upon one side of which highway, for a distance of 600 feet, 50 percent or more of the contiguous property fronting thereon is occupied by buildings in use for business, or (b) upon both sides of which highway, collectively, for a distance of 300 feet, 50 percent or more of the contiguous property fronting thereon is so occupied. A business district may be longer than the distances specified in this section if the above ratio of buildings in use for business to the length of the highway exists.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

236.

A “business representative” means a proprietor, a limited or general partner, a managerial employee, a stockholder, a director, or an officer who is active in the management, direction, and control of that part of a business which is a licensed activity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1563, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

240.

In determining whether a highway is within a business or residence district, the following limitations shall apply and shall qualify the definitions in Sections 235 and 515:

(a) No building shall be regarded unless its entrance faces the highway and the front of the building is within 75 feet of the roadway.

(b) Where a highway is physically divided into two or more roadways only those buildings facing each roadway separately shall be regarded for the purpose of determining whether the roadway is within a district.

(c) All churches, apartments, hotels, multiple dwelling houses, clubs, and public buildings, other than schools, shall be deemed to be business structures.

(d) A highway or portion of a highway shall not be deemed to be within a district regardless of the number of buildings upon the contiguous property if there is no right of access to the highway by vehicles from the contiguous property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

241.

A “buy-here-pay-here” dealer is a dealer, as defined in Section 285, who is not otherwise expressly excluded by Section 241.1, and who does all of the following:

(a) Enters into conditional sale contracts, within the meaning of subdivision (a) of Section 2981 of the Civil Code, and subject to the provisions of Chapter 2b (commencing with Section 2981) of Title 14 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code, or lease contracts, within the meaning of Section 2985.7 of the Civil Code, and subject to the provisions of Chapter 2d (commencing with Section 2985.7) of Title 14 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code.

(b) Assigns less than
 90 percent of all unrescinded conditional sale contracts and lease contracts to unaffiliated third-party finance or leasing sources within 45 days of the consummation of those contracts.

(c) For purposes of this section, a conditional sale contract does not include a contract for the sale of a motor vehicle if all amounts owed under the contract are paid in full within 30 days.

(d) The department may promulgate regulations as necessary to implement this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 741, Sec. 2.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

241.1.

The term “buy-here-pay-here” dealer does not include any of the following:

(a) A lessor who primarily leases vehicles that are two model years old or newer.

(b) A dealer that does both of the following:

(1) Certifies 100 percent of used vehicle inventory offered for sale at retail price pursuant to Section 11713.18.

(2) Maintains an onsite service and repair facility that is licensed by the Bureau of Automotive Repair and employs a minimum of five master automobile technicians that are certified by
 the National Institute for Automotive Service Excellence.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 741, Sec. 3.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

242.

A “camp trailer” is a vehicle designed to be used on a highway, capable of human habitation for camping or recreational purposes, that does not exceed 16 feet in overall length from the foremost point of the trailer hitch to the rear extremity of the trailer body and does not exceed 96 inches in width and includes any tent trailer. Where a trailer telescopes for travel, the size shall apply to the trailer as fully extended. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a camp trailer shall not be deemed to be a trailer coach.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1536.)
-------------------------------------------

243.
